Utah statutes.
58-37-13.   Property subject to forfeiture -- Seizure -- Procedure.

(1)  As used in this section:

(a)  "Claimant" means:

(i)  any owner as defined in this section; or

(ii)  any interest holder as defined in this section and any other person or entity who asserts a claim to any property seized for forfeiture under this section;

(b)  "Drug distributing paraphernalia" means any property used or designed to be used in the illegal transportation, storage, shipping, or circulation of a controlled substance.  Property is considered "designed to be used" for one or more of the above-listed purposes if the property has been altered or modified to include a feature or device which would actually promote or conceal a violation of this chapter.

(c)  "Drug manufacturing equipment or supplies" includes any illegally possessed controlled substance precursor, or any chemical, laboratory equipment, or laboratory supplies possessed with intent to engage in clandestine laboratory operations as defined in Section 58-37d-3.

(d)  "Interest holder" means a secured party as defined in Section 70A-9a-102, a mortgagee, lien creditor, or the beneficiary of a security interest or encumbrance pertaining to an interest in property, whose interest would be perfected against a good faith purchaser for value.  A person who holds property for the benefit of or as an agent or nominee for another, or who is not in substantial compliance with any statute requiring an interest in property to be recorded or reflected in public records in order to perfect the interest against a good faith purchaser for value, is not an interest holder.

(e)  "Owner" means an individual or entity who possesses a legal or equitable ownership in real or personal property.

(f)  "Proceeds" means property acquired directly or indirectly from, produced through, realized through, or caused by an act or omission and includes any property of any kind without reduction for expenses incurred in the acquisition, maintenance, or production of that property, or any other purpose.

(g)  "Real Property" means:

(i)  land; and

(ii)  any building, fixture, improvement, appurtenance, structure, or other development that is affixed permanently to land.

(h)  "Resolution of criminal charges" occurs at the time a claimant who is also charged with violations under Chapter 37, 37a, 37b, 37c, or 37d enters a plea, upon return of a jury verdict or court ruling in a criminal trial, or upon dismissal of the criminal charge.

(i)  "Violation of this chapter" means any conduct prohibited by Chapter 37, 37a, 37b, 37c, or 37d or any conduct occurring outside the state which would be a violation of the laws of the place where the conduct occurred and which would be a violation of Chapter 37, 37a, 37b, 37c, or 37d if the conduct had occurred in this state.

(2)  The following are subject to criminal or civil forfeiture pursuant to Title 24, Chapter 1, Utah Uniform Forfeiture Procedures Act:

(a)  all controlled substances which have been manufactured, distributed, dispensed, or acquired in violation of this chapter;

(b)  all raw materials, products, and equipment of any kind used, or intended for use, in manufacturing, compounding, processing, delivering, importing, or exporting any controlled substance in violation of this chapter;

(c)  all property used or intended for use as a container for property described in Subsections (2)(a) and (2)(b);

(d)  all hypodermic needles, syringes, and other paraphernalia, not including capsules used with health food supplements and herbs, used or intended for use to administer controlled substances in violation of this chapter;

(e)  all conveyances including aircraft, vehicles, or vessels used or intended to be used to facilitate the distribution or possession with intent to distribute the property described in Subsections (2)(a) and (2)(b);

(f)  all books, records, and research, including formulas, microfilm, tapes, and data used or intended for use in violation of this chapter;

(g)  everything of value furnished or intended to be furnished in exchange for a controlled substance in violation of this chapter, and all money, negotiable instruments, and securities used or intended to be used to facilitate any violation of this chapter.  An interest in property may not be civilly forfeited under this Subsection (2) unless it is proven by clear and convincing evidence that the owner or any interest holder knew of the conduct which made the property subject to forfeiture.  The burden of presenting this evidence is on the state;

(h)  all imitation controlled substances as defined in Section 58-37b-2, Imitation Controlled Substances Act;

(i) (i)  all warehousing, housing, and storage facilities, or interest in real property of any kind used, or intended for use, in producing, cultivating, warehousing, storing, distributing or manufacturing any controlled substances in violation of this chapter but only if:

(A)  the cumulative sales of controlled substances on the property within a two-month period total or exceed $1,000; or

(B)  the street value of any controlled substances found on the premises at any given time totals or exceeds $1,000, but only after the judge makes a specific finding of proportionality under Section 24-1-14, and subject to the condition that even if proportionality is found, the judge shall have discretion not to forfeit real property which is a primary residence.

(ii)  A narcotics officer experienced in controlled substances law enforcement may testify to establish the street value of the controlled substances for purposes of this Subsection (2);

(j)  any firearm, weapon, or ammunition carried or used in connection with a violation of this chapter or any firearm, weapon, or ammunition kept or located within the proximity of controlled substances;

(k)  all proceeds traceable to any violation of this chapter.

(3)  Property subject to forfeiture under this chapter may be seized by any peace officer of this state upon process issued by any court having jurisdiction over the property.  However, seizure without process may be made when:

(a)  the seizure is incident to an arrest or search under a search warrant or an inspection under an administrative inspection warrant;

(b)  the property subject to seizure has been the subject of a prior judgment in favor of the state in a criminal injunction or forfeiture proceeding under this chapter;

(c)  the peace officer has probable cause to believe that the property is directly or indirectly dangerous to health or safety; or

(d)  the peace officer has probable cause to believe that the property has been used or intended to be used in violation of this chapter and has probable cause to believe the property will be damaged, intentionally diminished in value, destroyed, concealed, or removed from the state.

(4)  Property taken or detained under this section is not repleviable but is in custody of the law enforcement agency making the seizure, subject only to the orders and decrees of the court or the official having jurisdiction.  When property is seized under this chapter, the appropriate person or agency may:

(a)  place the property under seal;

(b)  remove the property to a place designated by it or the warrant under which it was seized; or

(c)  take custody of the property and remove it to an appropriate location for disposition in accordance with law.

(5)  All substances listed in Schedule I that are possessed, transferred, distributed, or offered for distribution in violation of this chapter are contraband and no property right shall exist in them.  All substances listed in Schedule I which are seized or come into the possession of the state may be  retained for any evidentiary or investigative purpose, including sampling or other preservation prior to disposal or destruction by the state.

(6)  All marijuana or any species of plants from which controlled substances in Schedules I and II are derived which have been planted or cultivated in violation of this chapter, or of which the owners or cultivators are unknown, or are wild growths, may be seized and retained for any evidentiary or investigative purpose, including sampling or other preservation prior to disposal or destruction by the state.  Failure, upon demand by the department or its authorized agent, of any person in occupancy or in control of land or premises upon which species of plants are growing or being stored, to produce an appropriate license or proof that he is the holder of a license, is authority for the seizure and forfeiture of the plants.

(7) Forfeiture proceedings shall conform with the procedures and substantive protections of Title 24, Chapter 1, Utah Uniform Forfeiture Procedures Act.

